Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1449.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 49-426.03, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE49-426.03. Enforcement of federal hazardous air pollutant program; rules; fee A. The list of hazardous air pollutants in section 112(b)(1) of the clean air act is adopted as the list of federally listed hazardous air pollutants that will be subject to the program adopted pursuant to subsection B of this section. Within one year after the administrator adds or deletes a pollutant pursuant to section 112(b)(2) or (3) of the clean air act, the director shall adopt those revisions for the list adopted pursuant to this subsection unless the director finds that there is no scientific evidence to support the revision. B. The director shall adopt by rule a program for administration and enforcement of the federal hazardous air pollutant program established by section 112 of the clean air act. The program shall be consistent with and meet the requirements of section 112 of the clean air act and shall contain the following provisions: 1. After the date specified by the administrator in rules adopted pursuant to section 112(g)(1)(B) of the clean air act, no person may obtain a permit or permit revision to modify a major source of federally listed hazardous air pollutants or to construct a new major source of federally listed hazardous air pollutants, unless the director determines that the person will install the maximum achievable control technology for the modification or new major source. For purposes of this paragraph, the terms "major source" and "modification" have the meanings set forth in section 112(a) of the clean air act and implementing regulations adopted by the administrator. A new or modified major source of federally listed hazardous air pollutants means a major source that commences construction or a modification after rules adopted by the director pursuant to this subsection become effective pursuant to section 41-1032. A physical change to a source or change in the method of operation of a source is not a modification subject to this paragraph or paragraph 2 of this subsection if the change complies with section 112(g)(1) of the clean air act. 2. After the date specified by the administrator in rules adopted pursuant to section 112(g)(1)(B) of the clean air act and until the administrator adopts emissions standards establishing the maximum achievable control technology for a source category or subcategory that includes a source subject to paragraph 1 of this subsection, the director shall determine the maximum achievable control technology for the modification of new major source on a case-by-case basis. If the director determines that it is not feasible to prescribe or enforce an emission standard, a maximum achievable control technology standard imposed pursuant to this paragraph may consist of a design, equipment, work practice or operational standard, or a combination thereof. 3. If an existing source submits an application pursuant to section 49-426 which that demonstrates that the source has achieved a reduction of ninety per cent percent or more of federally listed hazardous air pollutants or ninety-five per cent percent in the case of federally listed hazardous air pollutants that are particulates, the director shall issue a permit or permit revision allowing the source to meet an alternative emission limitation reflecting such reduction in lieu of an emission limitation promulgated by the administrator under section 112(d) of the clean air act. The application shall comply with section 112(i)(5) of the clean air act and implementing regulations adopted by the administrator. The alternative emission limitation shall apply for a period of six years from the compliance date otherwise applicable to the source under section 112(d) of the clean air act. 4. If the administrator fails to adopt a standard for a source category or subcategory within eighteen months after the deadline established for that category or subcategory pursuant to section 112(e)(1) and (3) of the clean air act, the owner or operator of an existing major source in the category or subcategory shall be required to submit a permit application for such source pursuant to section 49-426, and the director, acting in accordance with the procedures adopted pursuant to section 49-426, shall be required to issue a permit establishing maximum achievable control technology for the affected source on a case-by-case basis or, in the alternative, an alternative emission limitation pursuant to paragraph 3 of this subsection. If the director determines that it is not feasible to prescribe or enforce an emission standard, a maximum achievable control technology standard imposed pursuant to this paragraph may consist of a design, equipment, work practice or operational standard, or a combination thereof. 5. When the administrator adopts and makes effective standards pursuant to section 112(d) or 112(f) of the clean air act, the director shall adopt those standards in the same manner as prescribed by the administrator. 6. When a reliable method of measuring emissions of a hazardous air pollutant subject to this section is not available, the director shall not require compliance with a numeric emission limit for that pollutant but shall instead require compliance with a design, equipment, work practice or operational standard, or a combination of those standards. The provision adopted pursuant to this paragraph shall not apply to sources or modifications that commence construction after the permit program established pursuant to section 49-426 becomes effective under section 502(h) of the clean air act. C. Where the clean air act has established provisions, including specific schedules, for the regulation of source categories pursuant to section 112(e)(5) and 112(n) of the clean air act, those provisions and schedules shall be adopted by the director and shall apply to the regulation of those source categories under subsection B of this section. D. For any category or subcategory of facilities licensed by the nuclear regulatory commission, the director shall not adopt or enforce any standard or limitation respecting emissions of radionuclides which that is more stringent than the standard or limitation adopted by the administrator pursuant to section 112 of the clean air act. E. When the administrator makes one of the following findings pursuant to section 112(n)(1)(A) of the clean air act, the finding is effective for purposes of the state's administration and enforcement of the federal hazardous air pollutant program in the same manner as prescribed by the administrator: 1. A finding that regulation is not appropriate or necessary. 2. A finding that alternative control strategies should be applied. F. The director shall adopt rules to establish a fee for implementing an asbestos regulatory program consistent with 40 code of federal regulations part 61, subpart m. The director shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all fees collected pursuant to this subsection in the air quality fee fund established by section 49-551. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 49-551, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE49-551. Air quality fee; air quality fund; purpose A. Every person who is required to register a motor vehicle in this state pursuant to section 28-2153 shall pay, in addition to the registration fee, an annual air quality fee at the time of vehicle registration of $1.50.  Unless and until the United States environmental protection agency grants a waiver for diesel fuel pursuant to section 211(c)(4) of the clean air act, every person who is required to register a diesel powered motor vehicle in this state with a declared gross weight as defined in section 28-5431 of more than eight thousand five hundred pounds and every person who is subject to an apportioned fee for diesel powered motor vehicles collected pursuant to title 28, chapter 7, articles 7 and 8 shall pay an additional apportioned diesel fee of $10. B. The registering officer shall collect the fees and immediately deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, the air quality fees in the air quality fund established by subsection C of this section and shall deposit the diesel fees in the voluntary vehicle repair program fund established pursuant to section 49-558.02. C. The air quality fund is established consisting of monies received pursuant to this section and section 49-426.03, gifts, grants and donations, and monies appropriated by the legislature.  The department of environmental quality shall administer the fund. Monies in the fund are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to the lapsing of appropriations. Interest earned on monies in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Monies in the air quality fund shall be used, subject to legislative appropriation, for: 1. Air quality research, experiments and programs conducted by or for the department for the purpose of bringing area A or area B into or maintaining area A or area B in attainment status, improving air quality in areas of this state outside area A or area B and reducing emissions of particulate matter, carbon monoxide, oxides of nitrogen, volatile organic compounds and hazardous air pollutants throughout the this state. 2. Monitoring visible air pollution and developing and implementing programs to reduce emissions of pollutants that contribute to visible air pollution in counties with a population of four hundred thousand persons or more. 3. Developing and adopting rules in compliance with sections 49-426.03, 49-426.04, 49-426.05 and 49-426.06. D. The department of environmental quality shall transfer $400,000 from the air quality fund to the department of administration for the purposes prescribed by section 49-588 in eight installments in each of the first eight months of a fiscal year. E. This section does not apply to an electrically powered golf cart or an electrically powered vehicle. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Legislative intent The legislature intends that the director of the department of environmental quality adopt fees pursuant to section 49-426.03, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by this act, only in an amount sufficient to cover the department's expenses in implementing the asbestos regulatory program.